Tennessee, session 114, SB1632.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SB1632
010367
- 1 -

SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 58, Chapter 1, Part 5, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
58-1-517.
(a) The army national guard armory, located on U.S. Highway 321 in Maryville,
Tennessee, is hereby designated as the "William O. Gregory Army National Guard
Armory", in honor of Command Sergeant Major William Gregory and his valuable service
to the army national guard and the state of Tennessee.
(b) From existing resources, the department of military is directed to erect
suitable signs or to affix suitable markers designating such edifice as the "William O.
Gregory Army National Guard Armory".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010367